Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.100

Informalities not fatal.

No informalities in the records in laying out, establishing, or altering any public highways existing on file in the offices of the various county auditors of this state or in the records of the department or the transportation commission, may be construed to invalidate or vacate the public highways.

[ 1984 c 7 s 29; 1963 c 4 s 36.75.100. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 11; RRS s 6450-11.]